prince/dictionaries/bg.aff
SFX V Y 96
SFX V   а         ал        а
SFX V   а         ала       а
SFX V   а         алата     а
SFX V   а         али       а
SFX V   а         алите     а
SFX V   а         алия      а
SFX V   а         алият     а
SFX V   а         ало       а
SFX V   а         алото     а
SFX V   а         ат        а
SFX V   а         ах        а
SFX V   а         аха       а
SFX V   а         ахме      а
SFX V   а         ахте      а
SFX V   а         ащ        а
SFX V   а         аща       а
SFX V   а         ащата     а
SFX V   а         ащи       а
SFX V   а         ащите     а
SFX V   а         ащия      а
SFX V   а         ащият     а
SFX V   а         ащо       а
SFX V   а         ащото     а
SFX V   а         ейки      а
SFX V   а         ел        а
SFX V   а         ела       а
SFX V   а         елата     а
SFX V   а         ели       а
SFX V   а         елите     а
SFX V   а         елия      а
SFX V   а         елият     а
SFX V   а         ело       а
SFX V   а         елото     а
SFX V   а         ете       а
SFX V   а         ех        а
SFX V   а         еха       а
SFX V   а         ехме      а
SFX V   а         ехте      а
SFX V   а         еше       а
SFX V   а         и         а
SFX V   а         им        а
SFX V   а         ите       а
SFX V   а         иш        а
SFX V   я         ейки      я
SFX V   я         ели       я
SFX V   я         елите     я
SFX V   я         ен        я
SFX V   я         ена       я
SFX V   я         ената     я
SFX V   я         ени       я
SFX V   я         ените     я
SFX V   я         ения      я
SFX V   я         еният     я
SFX V   я         ено       я
SFX V   я         еното     я
SFX V   я         еше       я
SFX V   я         и         я
SFX V   я         ил        я
SFX V   я         ила       я
SFX V   я         илата     я
SFX V   я         или       я
SFX V   я         илите     я
SFX V   я         илия      я
SFX V   я         илият     я
SFX V   я         ило       я
SFX V   я         илото     я
SFX V   я         им        я
SFX V   я         ите       я
SFX V   я         их        я
SFX V   я         иха       я
SFX V   я         ихме      я
SFX V   я         ихте      я
SFX V   я         иш        я
SFX V   я         й         я
SFX V   я         йте       я
SFX V   я         ял        я
SFX V   я         яла       я
SFX V   я         ялата     я
SFX V   я         ялия      я
SFX V   я         ялият     я
SFX V   я         яло       я
SFX V   я         ялото     я
SFX V   я         ят        я
SFX V   я         ях        я
SFX V   я         яха       я
SFX V   я         яхме      я
SFX V   я         яхте      я
SFX V   я         ящ        я
SFX V   я         яща       я
SFX V   я         ящата     я
SFX V   я         ящи       я
SFX V   я         ящите     я
SFX V   я         ящия      я
SFX V   я         ящият     я
SFX V   я         ящо       я
SFX V   я         ящото     я

SFX W Y 97
SFX W   ея        ее        ея
SFX W   ея        еейки     ея
SFX W   ея        еел       ея
SFX W   ея        еела      ея
SFX W   ея        еелата    ея
SFX W   ея        еели      ея
SFX W   ея        еелите    ея
SFX W   ея        еелия     ея
SFX W   ея        еелият    ея
SFX W   ея        еело      ея
SFX W   ея        еелото    ея
SFX W   ея        еем       ея
SFX W   ея        еете      ея
SFX W   ея        еех       ея
SFX W   ея        ееха      ея
SFX W   ея        еехме     ея
SFX W   ея        еехте     ея
SFX W   ея        ееш       ея
SFX W   ея        ееше      ея
SFX W   ея        еещ       ея
SFX W   ея        ееща      ея
SFX W   ея        еещата    ея
SFX W   ея        еещи      ея
SFX W   ея        еещите    ея
SFX W   ея        еещия     ея
SFX W   ея        еещият    ея
SFX W   ея        еещо      ея
SFX W   ея        еещото    ея
SFX W   ея        ей        ея
SFX W   ея        ейте      ея
SFX W   ея        ели       ея
SFX W   ея        елите     ея
SFX W   ея        елия      ея
SFX W   ея        елият     ея
SFX W   ея        ети       ея
SFX W   ея        етите     ея
SFX W   ея        еят       ея
SFX W   ея        я         ея
SFX W   ея        ял        ея
SFX W   ея        яла       ея
SFX W   ея        ялата     ея
SFX W   ея        яло       ея
SFX W   ея        ялото     ея
SFX W   ея        ят        ея
SFX W   ея        ята       ея
SFX W   ея        ятата     ея
SFX W   ея        ятия      ея
SFX W   ея        ятият     ея
SFX W   ея        ято       ея
SFX W   ея        ятото     ея
SFX W   ея        ях        ея
SFX W   ея        яха       ея
SFX W   ея        яхме      ея
SFX W   ея        яхте      ея
SFX W   жа        жат       жа
SFX W   жа        же        жа
SFX W   жа        жел       жа
SFX W   жа        жела      жа
SFX W   жа        желата    жа
SFX W   жа        жели      жа
SFX W   жа        желите    жа
SFX W   жа        желия     жа
SFX W   жа        желият    жа
SFX W   жа        жело      жа
SFX W   жа        желото    жа
SFX W   жа        жем       жа
SFX W   жа        жете      жа
SFX W   жа        жех       жа
SFX W   жа        жеха      жа
SFX W   жа        жехме     жа
SFX W   жа        жехте     жа
SFX W   жа        жеш       жа
SFX W   жа        жеше      жа
SFX W   жа        жи        жа
SFX W   жа        за        жа
SFX W   жа        зал       жа
SFX W   жа        зала      жа
SFX W   жа        залата    жа
SFX W   жа        зали      жа
SFX W   жа        залите    жа
SFX W   жа        залия     жа
SFX W   жа        залият    жа
SFX W   жа        зало      жа
SFX W   жа        залото    жа
SFX W   жа        зан       жа
SFX W   жа        зана      жа
SFX W   жа        заната    жа
SFX W   жа        зани      жа
SFX W   жа        заните    жа
SFX W   жа        зания     жа
SFX W   жа        заният    жа
SFX W   жа        зано      жа
SFX W   жа        заното    жа
SFX W   жа        зах       жа
SFX W   жа        заха      жа
SFX W   жа        захме     жа
SFX W   жа        захте     жа
